Wisconsin, session 2025, AB39.
do enact as follows:AB39,1Section 1. 230.35 (6) of the statutes is created to read:230.35 (6) (a) In this subsection, “state agency” has the meaning of “agency” given in s. 230.03 (3), except that “state agency” includes the Board of Regents of the University of Wisconsin System, the legislature, the courts, and a board, a commission, a committee, a council, or a department or unit thereof or an authority created under subch. II of ch. 114 or under ch. 231, 232, 234, 237, 238, or 279.(b) Each state agency shall require employees of that state agency to perform their assigned work duties at the offices of the state agency during the employee’s regularly scheduled work hours for at least 80 percent of the employee’s regularly scheduled work hours per month. This paragraph does not apply to duties that were performed off site, rather than at the offices of the state agency, before March 1, 2020. This paragraph does not apply to employees of the investment board.AB39,2Section 2. Effective date.(1) This act takes effect on December 31, 2025. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab39 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab39 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB39 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB39 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB39: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting